Florida, session 2026, HB7031.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Paragraph (n) of subsection (1) and paragraph
(c) of subsection (2) of section 220.03, Florida Statutes, are
amended to read:
220.03 Definitions.—
(1) SPECIFIC TERMS.—When used in this code, and when not
otherwise distinctly expressed or manifestly incompatible with
the intent thereof, the following terms shall have the following
meanings:
(n) "Internal Revenue Code" means the United States
Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended and in effect on
January 1, 2026 2025, except:
1. As provided in subsection (3);
2. Sections 168(k), 174(a), 163(j), 274, and 179 of the
Page 1 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7031 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
HB 7031, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
United States Internal Revenue Code of 1986 are included as
amended and in effect on January 1, 2025; and
3. Sections 168(n) and 174A are not included.
(2) DEFINITIONAL RULES.—When used in this code and neither
otherwise distinctly expressed nor manifestly incompatible with
the intent thereof:
(c) Any term used in this code has the same meaning as
when used in a comparable context in the Internal Revenue Code
and other statutes of the United States relating to federal
income taxes, as such code and statutes are in effect on January
1, 2026, except as provided in paragraph (1)(n) 2025. However,
if subsection (3) is implemented, the meaning of a term shall be
taken at the time the term is applied under this code.
Section 2. Subsection (2) of section 220.13, Florida
Statutes, is amended to read:
220.13 "Adjusted federal income" defined.—
(2) For purposes of this section, a taxpayer's taxable
income for the taxable year means taxable income as defined in
s. 63 of the Internal Revenue Code and properly reportable for
federal income tax purposes for the taxable year, except as
provided in s. 220.03(1)(n) and (2)(c), but subject to the
limitations set forth in paragraph (1)(b) with respect to the
deductions provided by ss. 172 (relating to net operating
losses), 170(d)(2) (relating to excess charitable
contributions), 404(a)(1)(D) (relating to excess pension trust
Page 2 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7031 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
HB 7031, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
contributions), 404(a)(3)(A) and (B) (to the extent relating to
excess stock bonus and profit-sharing trust contributions), and
1212 (relating to capital losses) of the Internal Revenue Code,
except that, subject to the same limitations, the term:
(a) "Taxable income," in the case of a life insurance
company subject to the tax imposed by s. 801 of the Internal
Revenue Code, means life insurance company taxable income;
however, for purposes of this code, the total of any amounts
subject to tax under s. 815(a)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code
pursuant to s. 801(c) of the Internal Revenue Code shall not
exceed, cumulatively, the total of any amounts determined under
s. 815(c)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954, as amended,
from January 1, 1972, to December 31, 1983;
(b) "Taxable income," in the case of an insurance company
subject to the tax imposed by s. 831(b) of the Internal Revenue
Code, means taxable investment income;
(c) "Taxable income," in the case of an insurance company
subject to the tax imposed by s. 831(a) of the Internal Revenue
Code, means insurance company taxable income;
(d) "Taxable income," in the case of a regulated
investment company subject to the tax imposed by s. 852 of the
Internal Revenue Code, means investment company taxable income;
(e) "Taxable income," in the case of a real estate
investment trust subject to the tax imposed by s. 857 of the
Internal Revenue Code, means the income subject to tax, computed
Page 3 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7031 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
HB 7031, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
as provided in s. 857 of the Internal Revenue Code;
(f) "Taxable income," in the case of a corporation which
is a member of an affiliated group of corporations filing a
consolidated income tax return for the taxable year for federal
income tax purposes, means taxable income of such corporation
for federal income tax purposes as if such corporation had filed
a separate federal income tax return for the taxable year and
each preceding taxable year for which it was a member of an
affiliated group, unless a consolidated return for the taxpayer
and others is required or elected under s. 220.131;
(g) "Taxable income," in the case of a cooperative
corporation or association, means the taxable income of such
organization determined in accordance with the provisions of ss.
1381-1388 of the Internal Revenue Code;
(h) "Taxable income," in the case of an organization which
is exempt from the federal income tax by reason of s. 501(a) of
the Internal Revenue Code, means its unrelated business taxable
income as determined under s. 512 of the Internal Revenue Code;
(i) "Taxable income," in the case of a corporation for
which there is in effect for the taxable year an election under
s. 1362(a) of the Internal Revenue Code, means the amounts
subject to tax under s. 1374 or s. 1375 of the Internal Revenue
Code for each taxable year;
(j) "Taxable income," in the case of a limited liability
100 company, other than a limited liability company classified as a
Page 4 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7031 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
HB 7031, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
101 partnership for federal income tax purposes, as defined in and
102 organized pursuant to chapter 605 or qualified to do business in
103 this state as a foreign limited liability company or other than
104 a similar limited liability company classified as a partnership
105 for federal income tax purposes and created as an artificial
106 entity pursuant to the statutes of the United States or any
107 other state, territory, possession, or jurisdiction, if such
108 limited liability company or similar entity is taxable as a
109 corporation for federal income tax purposes, means taxable
110 income determined as if such limited liability company were
111 required to file or had filed a federal corporate income tax
112 return under the Internal Revenue Code;
113 (k) "Taxable income," in the case of a taxpayer liable for
114 the alternative minimum tax as defined in s. 55 of the Internal
115 Revenue Code, means the alternative minimum taxable income as
116 defined in s. 55(b)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, less the
117 exemption amount computed under s. 55(d) of the Internal Revenue
118 Code. A taxpayer is not liable for the alternative minimum tax
119 unless the taxpayer's federal tax return, or related federal
120 consolidated tax return, if included in a consolidated return
121 for federal tax purposes, reflect a liability on the return
122 filed for the alternative minimum tax as defined in s. 55(b)(2)
123 of the Internal Revenue Code;
124 (l) "Taxable income," in the case of a taxpayer whose
125 taxable income is not otherwise defined in this subsection,
Page 5 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7031 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
HB 7031, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
126 means the sum of amounts to which a tax rate specified in s. 11
127 of the Internal Revenue Code plus the amount to which a tax rate
128 specified in s. 1201(a)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code are
129 applied for federal income tax purposes.
130 Section 3. (1) The amendments made by this act to ss.
131 220.03(1)(n) and (2)(c) and 220.13(2), Florida Statutes, operate
132 retroactively to January 1, 2026.
133 (2) Pursuant to the rulemaking authority in s. 213.06,
134 Florida Statutes, and the specific authority in s. 213.05,
135 Florida Statutes, for the Department of Revenue to regulate,
136 control, and administer all revenue laws therein, including all
137 portions of chapter 220, Florida Statutes, the Department of
138 Revenue shall adopt rules to implement this act.
139 (3) The Department of Revenue is authorized, and all
140 conditions are deemed met, to adopt emergency rules under s.
141 120.54(4), Florida Statutes, for the purpose of implementing
142 this act. Notwithstanding any other law, emergency rules adopted
143 under this section are effective for 6 months after adoption and
144 may be renewed during the pendency of procedures to adopt
145 permanent rules addressing the subject of the emergency rules.
146 Section 4. This act shall take effect upon becoming a law.
Page 6 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7031 -01-er